Colorado statutes. TITLE 35 Agriculture
ARTICLE 14
MEASUREMENT STANDARDS

Editor's note:

This article was numbered as article 1 of chapter 152, C.R.S. 1963. The provisions of this article were repealed and reenacted in 1983, resulting in the addition, relocation, and elimination of sections as well as subject matter. For amendments to this article prior to 1983, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated.

Section

35-14-101. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the "Measurement Standards Act of 1983".

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1339, § 1, effective July 1.

35-14-102. Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2009, (SB 09-113), ch. 88, p. 323, § 6, effective April 2, 2009.)

(1.7) "Certificate of conformance" means a document issued by the national type evaluation program constituting evidence of conformance of a weighing and measuring device with the requirements of national institute of standards and technology handbook 44.

"Certified scales" means scales located throughout the state which are used for public weighing and which meet the requirements of certification.

"Certified weighers" means a natural person who is certified under the provisions of this article.

"Commercial weighing and measuring devices" means those devices commercially used or employed in establishing the size, quantity, extent, area, or measurement of quantities, things, produce, or articles for distribution or consumption that are sold or offered or exposed for sale or hire or in computing any basic charge or payment for services rendered on the basis of weight, measure, or count.

(4.5) "Commission" means the state agricultural commission.

"Commissioner" means the commissioner of agriculture.

(5.5) "Commodity" means any agricultural commodity, consumer commodity, or any other goods.

"Commodity in package form" means a commodity put up or packaged in any manner in advance of sale in units suitable for either wholesale or retail sale. An individual item or lot of any commodity not in package form but on which there is marked a selling price based on an established price per unit of weight or of measure shall be construed to be a commodity in package form. The term "package" shall be construed to mean "commodity in package form".

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2009, (SB 09-113), ch. 88, p. 323, § 6, effective April 2, 2009.)

"Correct" means conformance to all applicable requirements of this article.

"Department" means the department of agriculture.

(9.5) "Grain protein analyzer" means the equipment and accessories used to determine the protein content of grain.

"Grain sample" means that portion of a grain, seed, or other agricultural commodity taken from the bulk of grain, seed, or other agricultural commodity for the purpose of determining moisture content.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2009, (SB 09-113), ch. 88, p. 323, § 6, effective April 2, 2009.)

"Inch pound system" means the United States customary system of weights and measures as approved by the United States department of commerce.

"Label" means any written, printed, or graphic matter affixed to, applied to, attached to, blown into, molded into, formed upon, embossed upon, or appearing upon or adjacent to a consumer commodity or a package containing any consumer commodity for purposes of branding, identifying, or giving any information with respect to the commodity or to the contents of the package; except that an inspector's tag or other nonpromotional matter affixed to or appearing upon a consumer commodity shall not be deemed to be a label requiring the repetition of label information required by this article.

"Laboratory" means the metrology laboratory of the division of inspection and consumer services in the department.

"Metric system" means the "Systeme Internationale System of Weights and Measures", as adopted by the United States department of commerce.

"Metrology services" means all testing and calibrating and, when necessary, the making of adjustments to weights and measures.

"Moisture content" means the percentage content of moisture and other volatiles on a wet basis in a grain sample as determined in a manner recognized by the United States department of agriculture.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2009, (SB 09-113), ch. 88, p. 323, § 6, effective April 2, 2009.)

"Moisture-testing device" means all equipment and accessories required for determining the moisture content in a grain sample.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2009, (SB 09-113), ch. 88, p. 323, § 6, effective April 2, 2009.)

(20.5) "National type evaluation program" means the evaluation program administered by the national conference on weights and measures.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2009, (SB 09-113), ch. 88, p. 323, § 6, effective April 2, 2009.)

"Not susceptible of repair" means any weight or measure that is designed or constructed in such a fashion so as to fail to comply with the applicable design or construction standards for such weight or measure or that cannot be repaired to meet the tolerance standards for such weight or measure.

and (23.5) (Deleted by amendment, L. 2009, (SB 09-113), ch. 88, p. 323, § 6, effective April 2, 2009.)

"Placing in service" means placing in use any new, used, repaired, or reconditioned weighing and measuring device.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2009, (SB 09-113), ch. 88, p. 323, § 6, effective April 2, 2009.)

"Random-weight package" means a package that is one of a lot, shipment, or delivery of packages of the same consumer commodity with varying weights, as when packages of the same consumer commodity have no fixed pattern of weight.

(27.5) "Reference standards" means the physical standards of the state that serve as the legal reference from which all other standards and weights and measures are derived pursuant to section 35-14-104.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2009, (SB 09-113), ch. 88, p. 323, § 6, effective April 2, 2009.)

"Secondary standards" means the physical standards that are traceable to the reference standards through comparisons, using acceptable procedures, and are used in the enforcement of weights and measures laws and rules.

(30.5) "Standard" means a weight or measure used as a reference to establish a measured quantity value.

"Traceable" means the system of determining the value of a standard by comparison with approved standards of the national institute of standards and technology.

(31.5) and (31.6) (Deleted by amendment, L. 2009, (SB 09-113), ch. 88, p. 323, § 6, effective April 2, 2009.)

"Vehicle" means any device by which any property, produce, commodity, or article is or may be transported.

"Weight" means net weight as used in connection with any commodity or service; except that, where the label states that the product is sold by drained weight, the term "weight" means net drained weight.

"Weights" or "measures" means all weights or measures of every kind, any instruments and devices for weighing and measuring, and any appliances and accessories associated with any or all of such instruments and devices.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1339, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 95:

(16), (22), and (31) amended and (1.7), (20.5), (23.5), (31.5), and (31.6) added, p. 893, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(1), (1.7), (4), (7), (11), (14), (16), (17), (18), (20), (20.5), (21), (22), (23), (23.5), (24), (25), (26), (28), (29), (30), (31.5), (31.6), and (33) amended and (4.5), (5.5), (27.5), and (30.5) added, (SB 09-113), ch. 88, p. 323, § 6, effective April 2.

L. 2011:

(9.5) added, (HB 11-1159), ch. 95, p. 279, § 1, effective August 10.

35-14-103. Systems of weights and measures - customary or metric.

The inch pound system and the metric system of weights and measures are jointly valid, and either one or both of these systems shall be used for all commercial purposes in this state. The definitions of basic units of weights and measures, the tables of weights and measures, and the equivalents of weights and measures, as published by the national institute of standards and technology, are recognized and shall govern weighing and measuring equipment and transactions in this state.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1342, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 894, § 2, effective July 1.

35-14-104. Physical standards.

Weights and measures that are traceable to the United States prototype standards supplied by the federal government, or approved as being satisfactory by the national institute of standards and technology, shall be the state's reference standards of weights and measures and shall be maintained in such calibration as prescribed by the national institute of standards and technology. All secondary standards may be prescribed by the commissioner and shall be verified upon their initial receipt and as often thereafter as deemed necessary by the commissioner. The commissioner shall have the custody and keep accurate records of the state standards of weights and measures and of the other standards and equipment provided for by this article.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1342, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 894, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

Entire section amended, (SB 09-113), ch. 88, p. 326, § 7, effective April 2.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 35-14-103 and 35-14-104 as they existed prior to 1983.

35-14-105. Technical requirements for weighing and measuring devices - certificate required - exception.

The specifications, tolerances, and other technical requirements, including user requirements, for commercial, law enforcement, data gathering, and other weighing and measuring devices adopted by the national conference on weights and measures and published in the national institute of standards and technology handbook 44, "Specifications, Tolerances, and Other Technical Requirements for Commercial Weighing and Measuring Devices", and supplements or revisions to that handbook, apply to weighing and measuring devices in this state, except as modified or rejected or as otherwise specified by this article or any rule promulgated pursuant to this article. Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, any weight or measure or any weighing or measuring instrument or device shall be issued a certificate of conformance from the national type evaluation program prior to use for commercial or law enforcement purposes.

A certificate of conformance is not required for a grain protein analyzer.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1342, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 894, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

Entire section amended, (SB 09-113), ch. 88, p. 326, § 8, effective April 2.

L. 2011:

Entire section amended, (HB 11-1159), ch. 95, p. 279, § 2, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 35-14-104 as it existed prior to 1983.

35-14-106. Administration.

The commissioner shall administer and enforce the provisions of this article and shall have and may exercise any and all of the administrative powers conferred upon the head of a department of the state. The commissioner is authorized to employ, pursuant to section 13 of article XII of the state constitution, such deputies and inspectors as he may deem necessary for the proper enforcement of this article, subject to the constitution and laws of the state. The powers and duties given to and imposed upon the commissioner are also given to and imposed upon the deputies and inspectors when acting under the instructions and at the direction of the commissioner.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1342, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 35-14-105 as it existed prior to 1983.

35-14-107. Powers and duties of commissioner - rules.

The commissioner shall:

Maintain traceability of this state's standards to the standards of the national institute of standards and technology;

Implement and carry out the provisions of this article;

Establish requirements for labeling, requirements for the presentation of cost-per-unit information, standards of weight, measure, or count, and reasonable standards of fill for any packaged commodity;

Grant any exemptions from this article or any rules promulgated pursuant to this article if in the commissioner's opinion such exemption would serve the public interest;

Conduct investigations to ensure compliance with this article;

Delegate to appropriate personnel any responsibilities for the proper administration of this article;

Test annually the standards of weights and measures used by any city or county within the state and approve the same when found to be correct; except that tuning forks used to determine the accuracy of radar guns shall not be subject to annual testing;

Inspect and test weights and measures kept, offered, or exposed for sale, including prepackaged commodities;

Inspect and test, to ascertain if they are correct, all commercial weighing and measuring devices for which the owner is required to be licensed under this article;

Test all weights and measures used in checking the receipt or disbursement of supplies in every state institution if funds are appropriated for such maintenance;

Approve for use, and may mark, such weights and measures as he or she finds to be correct and may reject and mark as rejected such weights and measures as he or she finds to be incorrect. Weights and measures that have been rejected may be seized if not corrected within the time specified or if used or disposed of in an unauthorized manner. The commissioner may condemn and seize weights and measures found to be incorrect and that are not capable of being made correct.

Weigh, measure, or inspect packaged commodities kept, offered, or exposed for sale, sold, or in the process of delivery to determine whether they contain the amounts represented and whether they are kept, offered, or exposed for sale in accordance with this article and the rules promulgated pursuant to this article. Accuracy of weight, measure, or count shall be determined by procedures set forth in the national institute of standards and technology handbook 133 as adopted by the national conference on weights and measures 1980, and any supplements or revisions thereto unless otherwise specified by the commissioner by rule. When the nature of the packaged commodity requires assistance in testing, the commissioner may request the person in possession of the package to furnish equipment and assistance to complete the test.

Prescribe the appropriate term or unit or weight or measure to be used whenever he determines, in the case of a specific commodity, that an existing practice of declaring the quantity by weight, measure, numerical count, or combination thereof does not facilitate value comparison or is represented in any manner that tends to mislead or deceive any person;

Allow reasonable variations from the stated quantity of contents, which shall include those caused by loss or gain of moisture during the course of good distribution practice or by unavoidable deviations in good manufacturing practice, only after the commodity has entered intrastate commerce;

Promulgate such rules as are necessary for the implementation and administration of this article in accordance with article 4 of title 24, C.R.S., including rules regarding the use of weights and measures, methods of sale, unit pricing, declaration of quantity, retail sales price representations for commodities and services, including requirements for cents-off and introductory offer promotions, and labeling requirements;

Negotiate and enter into contracts with local governments for the implementation and enforcement of this article.

The commissioner may, upon request, inspect and test any weight, measure, or standard used by a governmental entity.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1343, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 95:

(1)(a) and (1)(l) amended, p. 894, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(1)(a), (1)(d), (1)(g), (1)(i), (1)(k), (1)(l), and (1)(o) amended and (2) added, (SB 09-113), ch. 88, pp. 326, 323, §§ 9, 4, effective April 2.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 35-14-107 and 35-14-108 as they existed prior to 1983.

35-14-108. Special police powers.

When necessary to perform his duties or to implement the provisions of this article or the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant thereto, the commissioner or his authorized agent may:

Enter any commercial premises during normal business hours; except that, in the event such premises are not open to the public, he shall first present his credentials and obtain consent before making entry thereto unless a search warrant has previously been obtained;

Issue stop-use, hold, or removal orders with respect to any weights and measures commercially used and stop-sale, hold, and removal orders with respect to any packaged commodities or bulk commodities kept, offered, or exposed for sale which do not meet the requirements of this article;

Seize, for use as evidence and without formal warrant, any incorrect or unapproved weight, measure, package, or commodity found to be used, retained, offered, or exposed for sale or sold in violation of the provisions of this article or any rule or regulation promulgated pursuant thereto;

Stop any commercial vehicle and, after presentment of his credentials, require that the person in charge of the vehicle produce any documents in his possession concerning the contents of said vehicle, inspect the contents of such vehicle at the site, and, if necessary, require such person to proceed with the vehicle to some specified place for inspection.

The commissioner may administer oaths and take statements, issue subpoenas requiring the attendance of witnesses before him or her and the production of all books, memoranda, papers, and other documents, articles, or instruments, and compel the disclosure by such witnesses of all facts known to them relative to the matters under investigation. Upon the failure or refusal of any witness to obey any subpoena, the commissioner may petition the district court, and, upon a proper showing, the court may enter an order compelling the witness to appear and testify or produce documentary evidence. Failure to obey such an order of the court shall be punishable as a contempt of court.

If the owner, or the owner's agent, of any commercial premises or vehicle refuses to admit the commissioner to inspect such premises or vehicle, the commissioner may obtain from the district or county court for the district or county in which such premises or vehicle is located a warrant to enter and inspect such premises or vehicle.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1344, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(2) and (3) added, (SB 09-113), ch. 88, p. 328, § 10, effective April 2.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 35-14-112 as it existed prior to 1983.

35-14-109. Contract services. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1345, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 87:

(2) repealed, p. 492, § 43, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

Entire section repealed, (SB 09-113), ch. 88, p. 328, § 11, effective April 2.

Editor's note:

This section was similar to former §§ 35-14-114 and 35-14-115 as they existed prior to 1983.

35-14-110. Misrepresentation of quantity.

No person shall sell, offer, advertise, or expose for sale less than the quantity of commodity or service he represents nor take any more than the quantity of commodity or service he represents.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1345, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 35-14-119 and 35-14-120 as they existed prior to 1983.

35-14-111. Misrepresentation of price.

No person shall misrepresent the price of any commodity or service sold or offered, exposed, or advertised for sale by weight, measure, or count nor represent the price in any manner calculated or tending to mislead or in any way deceive a person.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1345, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 35-14-119 and 35-14-120 as they existed prior to 1983.

35-14-112. Method of sale - general.

Except as otherwise provided by the commissioner by rule, commodities in liquid form shall be sold by liquid measure or by weight, and commodities not in liquid form shall be sold only by weight, by measure, or by count, so long as the method of sale provides accurate quantity and pricing information.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1345, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 272, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

Entire section amended, p. 1507, § 55, effective June 1.

L. 2009:

Entire section amended, (SB 09-113), ch. 88, p. 328, § 12, effective April 2.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 35-14-118 as it existed prior to 1983.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1993 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 79, Session Laws of Colorado 1993.

35-14-113. Method of sale - special food products. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1345, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

Entire section repealed, (SB 09-113), ch. 88, p. 328, § 13, effective April 2.

Editor's note:

This section was similar to former § 35-14-118 as it existed prior to 1983.

35-14-114. Method of sale - special nonfood products. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1346, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 272, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 95:

(2)(a) amended, p. 896, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

Entire section repealed, (SB 09-113), ch. 88, p. 330, § 14, effective April 2.

Editor's note:

This section was similar to former § 35-14-118 as it existed prior to 1983.

35-14-115. Machine vended commodities.

Each vending machine which dispenses commodities in package form shall indicate:

Proper identity;

Net quantity; and

Name, address, and telephone number of the vendor or of the responsible party.

The requirements for product identity and net quantity can be met either by display of the package or by information posted on the outside of the machine.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1346, § 1, effective July 1.

35-14-116. Railroad car tare weights.

Whenever stenciled tare weights on freight cars are employed in the sale of commodities or the assessment of freight charges, the following conditions and requirements shall apply:

All newly stenciled or restenciled tare weights shall be accurately represented to the nearest one hundred pounds for inch pound units and to the nearest fifty kilograms for metric units, and the representation shall include the date of weighing.

The allowable difference between actual tare weight and stenciled tare weight on freight cars in use shall be:

If in inch pounds:

Plus or minus three hundred pounds for cars of fifty thousand pounds or less;

Plus or minus four hundred pounds for cars over fifty thousand pounds but not over sixty thousand pounds; or

Plus or minus five hundred pounds for cars over sixty thousand pounds;

If in metric:

Plus or minus one hundred fifty kilograms for cars twenty-five thousand kilograms or less;

Plus or minus two hundred kilograms for cars over twenty-five thousand kilograms but not over thirty thousand kilograms; or

Plus or minus two hundred fifty kilograms for cars over thirty thousand kilograms.

Tare weight determinations for verification or change of stenciled weights shall only be made on properly prepared and adequately cleaned freight cars.

Tank cars, covered hopper cars, flat cars equipped with multideck racks or special superstructures, mechanical refrigerator cars, and house-type cars equipped with special lading protective devices must be reweighed and restenciled only by owners or their authorized representatives if the car bears no lightweight (empty weight) stenciling or if repairs or alterations result in a change of weight in excess of the permissible lightweight tolerance.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1346, § 1, effective July 1.

35-14-117. Unit pricing - application - inch pound or metric.

Except for random-weight packages unit priced in accordance with rules promulgated pursuant to this article, any retail establishment providing unit price information in addition to the total price for any commodity shall also provide the unit price information for all such commodities as required by rules promulgated pursuant to this article.

Either metric or inch pound unit prices may be used for commodities marked in either system; except that, when unit price is changed to metric for any given type of commodity, unit pricing for all sources or suppliers of that commodity should change to metric.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1347, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(1) amended, (SB 09-113), ch. 88, p. 330, § 15, effective April 2.

35-14-118. Declarations on packages.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, any commodity in package form shall bear on the outside of the package a definite, plain, and conspicuous declaration of:

The net quantity of the contents in terms of weight, measure, or count; and

In the case of any package not sold on the premises where packed, the name and place of business of the manufacturer, packer, or distributor;

The identity of the commodity in the manner specified by rule promulgated pursuant to this article.

Under paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of this section, the commissioner, by regulation, shall establish reasonable variations or tolerances to be allowed and also exemptions as to small packages.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1347, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(1)(c) added, (SB 09-113), ch. 88, p. 330, § 16, effective April 2.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 35-14-119 as it existed prior to 1983.

35-14-119. Misleading packages - allowances.

No commodity in package form shall be so wrapped, nor shall it be in a container so made, formed, or filled as to mislead the purchaser as to the quantity of the contents of the package, and the contents of a container shall not fall below such reasonable standard of fill as may have been prescribed for the commodity in question by the commissioner.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1348, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 35-14-119 as it existed prior to 1983.

35-14-120. Declaration of unit price on random-weight packages.

In addition to the declarations required by section 35-14-118, any package being one of a lot containing random weights of the same commodity and bearing the total selling price of the package shall bear on the outside of the package a plain and conspicuous declaration of the price per single unit of weight.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1348, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 35-14-119 and 35-14-120 as they existed prior to 1983.

35-14-121. Weigher - qualification - certification - revocation.

A person who has sufficiently good moral character to carry on the business stated in the application, subject to section 24-5-101, C.R.S., who has the ability to weigh accurately, make correct weight certificates, and who has received from the commissioner a certificate of certified weigher may use the title of and shall be authorized to act as a certified weigher.

An application for a certificate of certified weigher shall be made upon a form provided by the commissioner. The application shall include evidence that the applicant has the qualifications required by subsection (1) of this section.

The commissioner may adopt rules for determining the qualifications of the applicant for a license as a certified weigher. For the purpose of determining qualifications of the applicant, the commissioner may approve the qualifications of the applicant upon the basis of the information supplied in the application or he may examine such applicant orally or in writing or both. He shall grant certificates of certified weigher to such applicants as may be found to possess the qualifications required by subsection (1) of this section. The commissioner shall keep a record of all such applicants and of all certificates issued.

The commissioner may, upon request and without charge, issue a limited certification as a certified weigher to any qualified officer or employee of a municipality or county of this state or of a state commission, board, institution, or agency authorizing such officer or employee to act as a certified weigher only within the scope of his official employment.

All certificates of certified weighers in existence as of June 30, 2009, shall expire five years after issuance. All certificates issued on or after July 1, 2009, shall expire on the date specified by the commissioner by rule. A certified weigher who fails to renew a certificate on or before the expiration date of the certificate shall pay a late fee, as established by the commission, in addition to the certificate fee. Renewal applications shall be in such form as the commissioner shall prescribe.

The following persons shall be permitted, but shall not be required, to obtain certification as certified weigher:

A weights and measures officer when acting within the scope of his official duties;

A person weighing property, produce, commodities, or articles that he or his employer, if any, is buying or selling; and

A person weighing property, produce, commodities, or articles in conformity with the requirements of federal law or the laws of this state relative to warehousemen or processors.

The commissioner, in accordance with section 24-4-104, C.R.S., may suspend, deny, revoke, restrict, place on probation, or refuse to renew the certificate of any certified weigher or applicant for such certificate if such certified weigher or applicant has been convicted in any court of competent jurisdiction of violating any provision of this article or if the commissioner is satisfied that the person has violated any provision of this article.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1348, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 95:

(1) and (7) amended, p. 896, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(5) amended, (SB 09-113), ch. 88, p. 330, § 17, effective April 2.

Editor's note:

This section is repealed, effective September 1, 2028, pursuant to § 35-14-134.

35-14-122. Public scales - requirements - weight certificates - procedures - records.

Provision shall be made for official certified scales throughout the state for the purpose of doing public weighing if the scale owners agree to meet the requirements of this article. Such scales shall be operated only by a certified weigher. All equipment used by certified weighers shall be approved by the commissioner.

The commissioner shall require the owner or operator of all certified scales to post on the outside of the scale house, where it can be conveniently observed by all persons, a sign at least twelve inches high and thirty-six inches long, stating the maximum weighing capacity of the scale. No person shall weigh or attempt to weigh any article or load having a greater weight or suspected weight greater than the rated capacity of the scale.

It is the duty of each certified weigher to weigh upon the certified scales any load delivered at the scales for weighing when engaged to do so by any person and to issue a certificate of correct weight.
(2) (a) (I) It is the duty of each certified weigher to weigh upon the certified scales any load delivered at the scales for weighing when engaged to do so by any person and to issue a certificate of correct weight.

The certificate of correct weight must state the gross weight of the load, the tare weight, the net weight of the load, and the date of weighing. In addition, the weight certificate must indicate:

The state license number of the vehicle or other positive identification;

A serial number;

The name of the shipper or the owner of the load;

The nature of the load;

The name of the receiver of the load;

Whether the driver is off or on the scale;

The name of the certified weigher;

The location of the certified scale; and

If the vehicle is being weighed in order to be registered in accordance with article 3 of title 42, the vehicle identification number, year of manufacture, and make.

For issuing a certificate, the certified weigher may charge a reasonable fee; except that no charge may be made for weighing done or for certificates issued upon the demand of the commissioner or any employee acting in an official capacity under this article 14.

All certified weighers shall keep a daily register in which they shall enter every transaction by them as certified weighers, including the gross weight of each load, the weight of the vehicle, the net weight of the load, the license number of the vehicle, if any, the name of the dealer or owner, the name of the weigher, the name of the person for whom the weighing was done, and the date of weighing. The daily register shall be kept by the certified weigher and shall be open at all times to inspection by the supervisor of measurements standards and all other inspectors of the department and by any other person interested therein. Such daily registers shall be kept for a period of two years.

A weighing made of any vehicle or combination of vehicles to ascertain the gross, tare, or net weight for commercial purposes or certification by a certified weigher shall not be determined by any procedure denominated as a split-weighing or fore-and-aft draft. The gross, tare, or net weight of any vehicle or combination of vehicles as a single unit shall be determined upon scales with platforms of sufficient size to accommodate the vehicle or combination of vehicles as one entire unit; except that the gross, tare, or net weight of a combination of vehicles may be determined upon a scale which will not accommodate the combination of vehicles as one entire unit if the same are separated and the weight of each member thereof can and is determined separately as an independent unit. In such cases, weight certificates shall be issued for each such separate weighing.

The certified scales shall be available for use by the public each day of the year during all reasonable business hours. Sundays and other legal holidays are excepted.

All persons, firms, and corporations which do public weighing for a fee shall keep a complete record of each such weighing for a period of two years, and at least one copy of each weighing certificate shall be retained on record at the place of weighing.

All commodities bought, sold, delivered, or in the process of changing ownership that use the weight of the content for final determination and settlement shall be weighed on a scale licensed in accordance with this article if neither the buyer nor the seller owns his or her own scale. The weigher shall issue a weight certificate containing all the information required by subsection (2) of this section to both the buyer and the seller. If the buyer or seller owns his or her own scale licensed by the department and uses such scale to determine the weight of such commodities, such party shall issue a ticket or invoice in duplicate to the other party. Said ticket or invoice shall contain all the information required by subsection (2) of this section.

All commodities bought, sold, delivered, or in the process of changing ownership for which a weight certificate, ticket, or invoice has been issued pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (6) and which are being hauled or transported on the streets, roads, or highways of this state shall be accompanied with a weight certificate or a ticket or invoice containing the information required by subsection (2) of this section.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1349, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(6)(a) amended, (SB 09-113), ch. 88, p. 336, § 24, effective April 2.

L. 2022:

(2)(a) amended, (SB 22-108), ch. 63, p. 319, § 2, effective August 10.